Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2582.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 507E.8, subsection 1, paragraphs a and b, Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: a. For purposes of an arrest resulting from a criminal violation of any provision of the Code subject to the jurisdiction of the commissioner established as a result of an investigation pursuant to this chapter or chapter 502 , 502A , 507A , 522C, 522F, 523A , 523C , 523D , or 523I . b. While conducting an investigation or engaged in an assignment authorized by this chapter or chapter 502 , 502A , 507A , 522C, 522F, 523A , 523C , 523D , or 523I . House File 2582, p. 2 Sec. 2. Section 522C.4, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new paragraph: NEW PARAGRAPH . d. An insurance producer licensed under chapter 522B appointed by, and granted claim authority by, an insurer or self-insurer. Sec. 3. Section 522C.7, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 522C.7 Financial responsibility. 1. Prior to issuance of a license under section 522C.5A , 522C.5B , 522C.5C , or 522C.5D , an applicant shall secure evidence of financial responsibility through a surety bond as in a form and manner prescribed by the commissioner. The surety bond shall be executed and issued by an insurer authorized to issue surety bonds in this state and meet the following requirements: a. The surety bond shall be a minimum of fifty thousand dollars. b. The surety bond shall be in favor of the state and specifically authorize recovery by the commissioner on behalf of any person in this state who sustains damages as the result of an adjusterâs erroneous act, failure to act, fraud, or unfair or deceptive act or practice under chapter 507B . c. The surety bond shall not be terminated without prior written notice filed with the division a minimum of thirty calendar days prior to termination. 2. The division may request that an adjuster provide evidence of financial responsibility at any time the division deems relevant. 3. An adjuster shall immediately notify the division if the adjusterâs evidence of financial responsibility terminates in violation of subsection 1 , paragraph âcâ , or becomes impaired, and the adjusterâs license shall become inactive until the adjuster provides the division with evidence of financial responsibility. Sec. 4. EMERGENCY RULES. The insurance division may adopt emergency rules under section 17A.4, subsection 3, and section 17A.5, subsection 2, paragraph âbâ, to implement the provisions of this Act amending section 522C.7, and the rules shall be effective immediately upon filing unless a later date is House File 2582, p. 3 specified in the rules. Any rules adopted in accordance with this section shall also be published as a notice of intended action as provided in section 17A.4. Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 2582, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor